Hawaii statutes.
§342B-12 Specific powers of the director.
The director may:

(1) Establish ambient air quality standards for the
State as a whole or for any part thereof;

(2) Establish and administer any permit program;

(3) Establish by rule the control of open burning,
fugitive dust, and visible emissions;

(4) Establish by rule the control of vehicular smoke
emission and require the installation, use, and proper operation and
maintenance of air pollution control equipment for motor vehicles;

(5) Establish and administer a program of inspection
and testing of all modes of transportation except aircraft, to enforce
compliance with applicable emission limitations when necessary and practicable,
and to control or limit the operation of motor vehicular and other modes of
transportation when the director finds pursuant to standards established by
rules such modes of transportation are producing or pose an immediate danger of
producing unacceptable levels of air pollution or when such control is
necessary to meet applicable ambient air quality standards;

(6) Establish by rule other specific areas for
control of air pollution, thereby allowing for varying conditions;

(7) Establish standards of performance or rules for
existing, new, or modified stationary sources or adopt standards of performance
for existing, new, or modified stationary sources as promulgated by the
administrator;

(8) Establish maximum achievable control technology
standards or rules for the control of hazardous air pollutants from existing,
new, or modified sources or adopt maximum achievable control technology as
promulgated by the administrator;

(9) Establish rules for the prevention of significant
deterioration of air quality or adopt prevention of significant deterioration
regulations as promulgated by the administrator; and

(10) Establish rules allowing for environmental permit
shields. [L 1992, c 240, pt of §1; am L 1994, c 268, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next